Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 200 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma AI
Education Innovation Act".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund to be designated the "Oklahoma AI Education Innovation
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of:
1. All monies appropriated to the fund by the Legislature;
2. All monies received from gifts, grants, reimbursements, or
other contributions from public or private sources for purposes
consistent with this act;
3. Any interest or investment earnings attributable to monies
in the fund; and
4. Any other monies designated for deposit in the fund.
B. All monies accruing to the credit of the Oklahoma AI
Education Innovation Revolving Fund are hereby appropriated and
shall be budgeted and distributed by the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services as follows:
1. Forty-two and two-tenths percent (42.2%) to the State
Department of Education;
2. Forty-two and two-tenths percent (42.2%) to the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education;
3. Eight and nine-tenths percent (8.9%) to the Oklahoma
Department of Career and Technology Education; and
4. Six and seven-tenths percent (6.7%) to the Oklahoma
Department of Libraries.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Distributions from the fund shall be made quarterly,
beginning on the first day of the fiscal quarter following the
effective date of this act, and on the first day of each fiscal
quarter thereafter. The Office of Management and Enterprise
Services shall transfer the amounts specified in subsection B of
this section to each designated agency within ten (10) business days
of the beginning of each fiscal quarter.
D. Monies distributed from the Oklahoma AI Education Innovation
Revolving Fund shall be expended by the receiving agencies solely
for one or more of the following purposes related to artificial
intelligence in education:
1. Development, acquisition, and implementation of artificial
intelligence tools, platforms, and resources for educational use;
2. Professional development and training for educators,
administrators, librarians, and staff on the effective and ethical
use of artificial intelligence in educational settings;
3. Curriculum development integrating artificial intelligence
concepts, digital literacy, and computational thinking;
4. Research and evaluation of artificial intelligence
applications in education;
5. Student programs and initiatives promoting artificial
intelligence literacy and workforce readiness;
6. Infrastructure improvements necessary to support artificial
intelligence educational initiatives;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Public awareness and community education programs regarding
artificial intelligence; and
8. Administrative costs directly related to the purposes
enumerated in this subsection, provided that no more than five
percent (5%) of any agency's annual distribution may be expended for
administrative costs.
E. Monies in the Oklahoma AI Education Innovation Revolving
Fund, and monies distributed therefrom to the agencies designated in
subsection B of this section, shall be used solely for the purposes
specified in subsection D of this section and for no other purpose
whatsoever. Any appropriation, transfer, expenditure, or use of any
monies in the fund or distributed from the fund for any purpose not
authorized by subsection D of this section shall be null and void
and of no effect.
F. Monies distributed from the fund to the agencies designated
in subsection B of this section that are not expended during a
fiscal year shall not revert to the fund or to the General Revenue
Fund but shall be retained by the receiving agency and shall remain
available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years for the
purposes specified in subsection D of this section.
G. No later than October 1 of each year, each agency receiving
monies from the Oklahoma AI Education Innovation Revolving Fund
shall submit a report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of
the Oklahoma State Senate, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Repr esentatives, and the Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council
detailing:
1. The total amount of monies received from the fund during the
preceding fiscal year;
2. A detailed accounting of all expenditures made from such
monies, organized by the purpose categories specified in subsection
D of this section;
3. The educational outcomes achieved through such expenditures;
4. Any unexpended balances and the intended use of such
balances; and
5. Recommended improvements or modifications to the agency's
artificial intelligence education initiatives.
H. The State Treasurer shall maintain separate accounts within
the Oklahoma AI Education Innovation Revolving Fund sufficient to
track deposits, distributions, and balances attributable to each
funding source.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 202 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created, to continue until July 1, 2031, in
accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Sunset Law, the
Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council.
B. The Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council shall consist of
seventeen (17) members as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. The State Superintendent of Public Instruction, or designee;
2. The Chancellor of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, or designee;
3. The State Director of the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, or designee;
4. The Director of the Oklahoma Department of Libraries, or
designee;
5. One member appointed by the Governor with experience in
artificial intelligence research or development;
6. One member appointed by the Governor with experience in K-12
education;
7. One member appointed by the Governor with experience in
workforce development;
8. One member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate with experience in higher education;
9. One member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate with experience in educational technology;
10. One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives with experience in business or industry utilizing
artificial intelligence;
11. One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives with experience in rural education;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

12. One member who is a current classroom teacher, appointed
jointly by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction and the
Chancellor of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;
13. One member who is a current public school administrator,
appointed by the State Superintendent of Public Instruction;
14. One member who is a current faculty member at an
institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
appointed by the Chancellor of the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education;
15. One member representing Oklahoma tribal nations with
interest in educational technology, appointed by the Governor in
consultation with the Oklahoma Indian Affairs Commission;
16. One member who is a current student enrolled in a public
high school or institution of higher education in Oklahoma,
appointed jointly by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and
the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
17. One member representing the Oklahoma business community,
appointed by the Governor.
C. 1. The four ex officio members designated in paragraphs 1
through 4 of subsection B of this section shall serve for the
duration of their terms of office.
2. Appointed members shall serve for terms of three (3) years
and may be reappointed for one additional term.
3. Initial appointments shall be staggered as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. members appointed pursuant to paragraphs 5, 8, 10, 12,
and 15 of subsection B of this section shall serve
initial terms of three (3) years,
b. members appointed pursuant to paragraphs 6, 9, 11, 13,
and 16 of subsection B of this section shall serve
initial terms of two (2) years, and
c. members appointed pursuant to paragraphs 7, 14, and 17
of subsection B of this section shall serve initial
terms of one (1) year.
4. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same
manner as the original appointment.
5. Any member may be removed by the appointing authority for
cause.
D. Members of the Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council shall
be exempt from the dual-office-holding prohibitions of Section 6 of
Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
E. Members of the Council shall receive no compensation for
their service but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties in accordance with the
State Travel Reimbursement Act.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 203 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

A. The Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council shall have the
following powers and duties:
1. Advise and make recommendations to the State Department of
Education, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the
Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education, and the
Oklahoma Department of Libraries on matters relating to:
a. the development and implementation of artificial
intelligence education initiatives,
b. coordination among agencies to maximize the
effectiveness of artificial intelligence education
investments,
c. best practices for integrating artificial intelligence
into curriculum and instruction,
d. ethical considerations and responsible use of
artificial intelligence in educational settings,
e. workforce preparation for careers involving artificial
intelligence, and
f. digital literacy and equitable access to artificial
intelligence educational resources;
2. Review the annual reports submitted by agencies pursuant to
Section 2 of this act and provide feedback and recommendations;
3. Identify gaps, redundancies, or opportunities for
collaboration among agencies receiving monies from the Oklahoma AI
Education Innovation Revolving Fund;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Monitor national and international trends in artificial
intelligence education and make recommendations for Oklahoma to
remain competitive;
5. Engage with stakeholders including educators, students,
parents, employers, and community members to gather input on
artificial intelligence education needs and priorities;
6. Develop and recommend metrics for evaluating the
effectiveness of artificial intelligence education initiatives
funded through the Oklahoma AI Education Innovation Revolving Fund;
and
7. Perform such other advisory duties as may be requested by
the Governor, the Legislature, or the agencies receiving monies from
the fund.
B. The Council shall have no authority to direct, control, or
supervise the operations of any state agency, institution, or school
district. All recommendations of the Council shall be advisory only
and shall not be binding on any agency or institution.
C. No later than December 1 of each year, the Council shall
submit an annual report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
State Board of Education, and the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education. The report shall include:
1. A summary of Council activities during the preceding year;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. An assessment of the progress of artificial intelligence
education initiatives across all receiving agencies;
3. Findings and recommendations for improving coordination and
effectiveness;
4. Identification of emerging opportunities or challenges in
artificial intelligence education; and
5. Any recommended legislative or administrative actions.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 204 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma AI Education Advisory Council shall meet at
least quarterly at the call of the chair. Additional meetings may
be called by the chair, or upon written request of a majority of the
members.
B. At its first meeting, the Council shall elect from among its
members a chair and a vice-chair who shall serve for terms of two
(2) years. The chair and vice-chair may be reelected.
C. A majority of the members of the Council shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business. All official actions of the
Council shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of those
members present and voting.
D. The Council may establish subcommittees as it deems
necessary to carry out its duties. Subcommittees may include

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

indi viduals who are not members of the Council, provided that such
individuals shall serve in a nonvoting advisory capacity.
E. All meetings of the Council and its subcommittees shall be
subject to the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act.
F. The State Department of Education, the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education, the Oklahoma Department of Career and
Technology Education, and the Oklahoma Department of Libraries shall
provide staff support, information, and assistance to the Council as
requested. The agencies may designate staff to serve jointly as
support for the Council and may share the costs of such support
proportionally based on the distribution percentages specified in
Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 205 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
If any provision of this act or the application thereof to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not
affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be
given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to
this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
April 16, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1782 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)